DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-261

SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GR-05

DTC | c1763/63,C 1764/64 | Fluid Pressure Abnormality
(Valve Does Not Open)
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Controlvalve assembly
« Control valve assembly circuit
C1763/63 .
) ] e Fluid pressure sensor
Whenthe pump &motoris ON andthe pump delivery pressure « Fluid clogin the fluid line or each solenoid valve
hasexceeded 15.8MPa( 161 " kgf/cm™, 2,290 psi) continuously
* Height control accumulator
for 0.3 sec.
* Height control accumulator circuit
C1764/64 .
¢ Fluid pressure sensor
* Fluid cloginthefluid line or each solenoid valve

Fail safe function:

Ifthe DTCC 1763/63detected, the height controlis prohibited after the following controls have
been performed.

€ Incasethatthe height of the defectwheelis -10mm (-0.4in.)to+ 10mm (0.4in.) against
the other wheels, adjust the normal wheels to the standard height.

# Incasethatthe height ofthe defectwheelis morethan 10mm (0.4 in.) higherthanthe other
wheels, adjustthe normalwheels  10mm (0.4in.) higher.

€ Incasethatthe height ofthe defectwheelislessthan 10mm (0.4in.) lowerthanthe other
wheels, adjustthenormalwheels  10mm (0.4in.) lower.

Ifthe DTCC 1764 /64 detected, the ECU prohibits the control of accumulating and releasing of

the pressure of the height control accumulator.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check control valve solenoid and accumulator solenoid.

F05729

F05723

@

CONTROL VALVE SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the control valve assembly connector.
CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals 2 and 1,3,4,50fthecon-
trol valve assembly connector.
OK:
Continuity

ACCUMULATOR SOLENOID
PREPARATION:
Disconnect the accumulator solenoid connector from the height
control accumulator.
CHECK:
Check continuity betweenterminals 1 and 2 ofthe accumulator
solenoid connector.
OK:
Continuity

solenoid.

NG> Replace control valve assembly or accumulator

2 [ Check fluid pressure sensor.

0 ]

F05726

' SER (W/G) (RM6 16E)

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the fluid pressure sensor connector.

CHECK:

(@) Connect3drybatteriesof  1.5Vinseries.

(b) Connect terminal 3 to the batteries’ positive (+) terminal,
andterminal 1 tothebatteries’negative( -)terminal,then
apply voltage about 4.5V betweenterminals 1 and3.

(c) Measure voltage betweenterminals 1 and 2.

Voltage: Approx. 4.5V

NG> Replace fluid pressure sensor.
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3 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between control
valve assembly, height control accumulator and suspension control ECU (See
page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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